Hawaii statutes.
[§431:10H-204.5] Electronic enrollment for
group policies. (a) In the case of a group defined in paragraph (1) of
the definition of "group long-term care insurance" in section 431:10H-104,
any requirement that a signature of an insured be obtained by an agent or
insurer shall be deemed satisfied if:

(1) The consent is obtained by telephonic or
electronic enrollment by the group policyholder or insurer. A verification of
enrollment information shall be provided to the enrollee;

(2) The telephonic or electronic enrollment provides
necessary and reasonable safeguards to assure the accuracy, retention, and
prompt retrieval of records; and

(3) The telephonic or electronic enrollment provides
necessary and reasonable safeguards to assure that the confidentiality of
individually identifiable information and privileged information is maintained.

(b) The insurer shall make available, upon
request of the commissioner, records that will demonstrate the insurer's
ability to confirm enrollment and coverage amounts. [L 2007, c 233, pt of §4]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next